Illinois, session 104th, HB3635.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act is 5amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 115/2)  (from Ch. 48, par. 39m-2)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. For all employees, other than 8separated employees, "wages" shall be defined as any 9compensation owed a former, current, or future an employee by 10an employer pursuant to an employment contract or agreement 11between the 2 parties, whether the amount is determined on a 12time, task, piece, or any other basis of calculation, or any 13severance, back pay, front pay, or concomitant relief owed to 14an employee pursuant to a separation or severance agreement 15between the 2 parties, policy of the employer, judicial 16ruling, or administrative ruling. Payments to separated 17employees shall be termed "final compensation" and shall be 18defined as wages, as defined in this Section, salaries, earned 19commissions, earned bonuses, and the monetary equivalent of 20earned vacation and earned holidays, and any other 21compensation owed the employee by the employer pursuant to an 22employment contract or agreement between the 2 parties. Where 23an employer is legally committed through a collective   HB3635- 2 -LRB104 07796 SPS 17841 b1bargaining agreement or otherwise to make contributions to an 2employee benefit, trust or fund on the basis of a certain 3amount per hour, day, week or other period of time, the amount 4due from the employer to such employee benefit, trust, or fund 5shall be defined as "wage supplements", subject to the wage 6collection provisions of this Act.7    As used in this Act, the term "employer" shall include any 8individual, partnership, association, corporation, limited 9liability company, business trust, employment and labor 10placement agencies where wage payments are made directly or 11indirectly by the agency or business for work undertaken by 12employees under hire to a third party pursuant to a contract 13between the business or agency with the third party, or any 14person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in 15the interest of an employer in relation to an employee, for 16which one or more persons is gainfully employed.17    As used in this Act, the term "employee" shall include any 18individual permitted to work by an employer in an occupation. 19"Employee" also includes any individual to whom an employer 20owes any severance, back pay, front pay, or concomitant relief 21pursuant to an agreement between the 2 parties, policy of the 22employer, judicial ruling, or administrative ruling. 23"Employee" , but shall not include any individual:24        (1) who has been and will continue to be free from 25    control and direction over the performance of his work, 26    both under his contract of service with his employer and   HB3635- 3 -LRB104 07796 SPS 17841 b1    in fact; and2        (2) who performs work which is either outside the 3    usual course of business or is performed outside all of 4    the places of business of the employer unless the employer 5    is in the business of contracting with third parties for 6    the placement of employees; and7        (3) who is in an independently established trade, 8    occupation, profession or business.9    "Pay stub" means an itemized statement or statements 10reflecting an employee's hours worked, rate of pay, overtime 11pay and overtime hours worked, gross wages earned, deductions 12made from the employee's wages, and the total of wages and 13deductions year to date.14    The following terms apply to an employer's use of payroll 15cards to pay wages to an employee under the requirements of 16this Act:17    "Payroll card" means a card provided to an employee by an 18employer or other payroll card issuer as a means of accessing 19the employee's payroll card account.20    "Payroll card account" means an account that is directly 21or indirectly established through an employer and to which 22deposits of a participating employee's wages are made.23    "Payroll card issuer" means a bank, financial institution, 24or other entity that issues a payroll card to an employee under 25an employer payroll card program. 26(Source: P.A. 103-953, eff. 1-1-25.)